Utah statutes.
53B-13a-103.   Establishment of the Utah Centennial Opportunity Program for Education.

(1)  The Legislature finds that the general welfare and well-being of the state are directly related to the educational levels and skills of the citizens of the state, and that limited financial aid for students with demonstrated  financial need to help finance costs of attendance at Utah public postsecondary institutions is a necessary component for ensuring access to postsecondary education and training as the state enters its second century of statehood.

(2)  There is created the Utah Centennial Opportunity Program for Education to provide this limited financial assistance.

